Utah statutes.
75-7-108.   Principal place of administration.
(1)  Without precluding other means for establishing a sufficient connection
with the designated jurisdiction, terms of a trust designating the principal
place of administration are valid and controlling if:
(a)  a trustee's principal place of business is located in or a trustee is a
resident of the designated jurisdiction; or
(b)  all or part of the administration occurs in the designated jurisdiction.
(2)  A trustee is under a continuing duty to administer the trust at a place
appropriate to its purposes, its administration, and the interests of the
beneficiaries.
(3)  Without precluding the right of the court to order, approve, or
disapprove a transfer, the trustee, in furtherance of the duty prescribed by
Subsection (2), may transfer the trust's principal place of administration to
another state or to a jurisdiction outside of the United States.
(4)  The trustee shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of a proposed
transfer of a trust's principal place of administration not less than 60 days
before initiating the transfer.  The notice of proposed transfer must include:
(a)  the name of the jurisdiction to which the principal place of
administration is to be transferred;
(b)  the address and telephone number at the new location at which the trustee
can be contacted;
(c)  an explanation of the reasons for the proposed transfer;
(d)  the date on which the proposed transfer is anticipated to occur; and
(e)  the date, not less than 60 days after the giving of the notice, by which
the qualified beneficiary must notify the trustee of an objection to the
proposed transfer.
(5)  The authority of a trustee under this section to transfer a trust's
principal place of administration terminates if a qualified beneficiary
notifies the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer on or before the
date specified in the notice.
(6)  In connection with a transfer of the trust's principal place of
administration, the trustee may transfer some or all of the trust property to
a successor trustee designated in the terms of the trust or appointed pursuant
to Section 75-7-704.
